Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 5

Sale of Surplus Public Property

12-2-501. Disposal of real or personal property by private negotiation and sale.

Notwithstanding any rule, regulation or other law to the contrary, any county, metropolitan government, municipality or other political subdivision of this state, upon majority vote of the local legislative body, may dispose of real property or personal property by private negotiation and sale where:

The real or personal property is significant for its architectural, archaeological, artistic, cultural or historical associations, or significant for its relationship to other property significant for architectural, archaeological, artistic, cultural or historical associations, or significant for its natural, scenic or open condition;

The real or personal property is to be sold to a nonprofit corporation or trust whose purposes include the preservation or conservation of real or personal properties of architectural, archaeological, artistic, cultural, historical, natural or scenic significance; and

A preservation agreement or conservation agreement is placed in the deed conveying the property from the county, metropolitan government, municipality or other political subdivision of this state to the nonprofit corporation or trust. The nonprofit corporation or trust shall only dispose of or use such real or personal property subject to covenants or other legally binding restrictions that will promote the preservation or conservation of the property, and, where appropriate, secure rights of public access.

Acts 2013, ch. 115, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of city and county to dispose of surplus real property by private sale. OAG 13-84, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 85 (10/31/13).